Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-561
Railway tracks; lighting, city may require; cost; assessment.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to require the lighting of the railroad track of any railway within the city or village in such manner as prescribed by ordinance. If any company owning or operating such railway fails to comply with such requirements, the city council or village board of trustees may cause such lighting to be done and may assess the expense of such lighting against such company. Such assessment shall constitute a lien upon any real estate belonging to such company and lying within such city or village and may be collected in the same manner as taxes for general purposes.

Laws 1911, c. 19, § 1, p. 136;

R.S.1913, § 5135;

C.S.1922, § 4310;

C.S.1929, § 17-501;

R.S.1943, § 17-561;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 186.